Illinois, session 104th, HB518.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freelance Worker Protection Act is amended 5by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 193/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Freelance Worker Protection Act.9(Source: P.A. 103-417, eff. 7-1-24.)